Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4641.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 75102. (1) The following lands are designated as dark sky preserves: (a) State-owned land at Lake Hudson, legally described as: All state-owned land located in Sections 25, 26, 27, 34, 35, and 36, T7S, R1E, and Section 1, T8S, R1E - Lenawee County, Michigan. (b) The state-owned land comprising Wilderness State Park and the state forestland within Bliss Township, Cross Village Township, and Wawatam in Emmet County. (c) Those portions of Port Crescent State Park lying north and west of the Pinnebog River in section 9 of Hume Township, Huron County, T18N, R12E. (d) The state-owned land comprising Rockport State Recreation Area, located in Presque Isle Township, Presque Isle County and Alpena Township, Alpena County. (e) The state-owned land comprising Negwegon State Park, located in Sanborn Township, Alpena County and Alcona Township, Alcona County. (f) The state-owned land comprising Thompson's Harbor State Park, located in Krakow Township, Presque Isle County. (g) The county-owned land comprising Dr. T. K. Lawless Park, located in Porter and Newberg Townships, Cass County. (h) The county-owned land comprising Headlands International Dark Sky Park, located in Wawatam Township, Emmet County. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a dark sky preserve shall not be established in the Upper Peninsula.